Hawaii statutes.
§304A-1404 Center for nursing;
establishment; advisory board. (a) There is established, within the
University of Hawaii school of nursing and dental hygiene, a center for
nursing.

(b) The dean of the school of nursing and
dental hygiene, or the dean's designee, shall direct the activities of the
center for nursing. There shall be an advisory board composed of nine voting
members, a majority of whom shall be nurses or representatives of nursing
organizations, appointed by the governor pursuant to section 26-34 to staggered
terms, including:

(1) Five members who are nurses with an active Hawaii
nursing license, including but not limited to:

(A) A nursing executive;

(B) An advanced practice registered nurse;

(C) A nurse affiliated with a nurse collective
bargaining organization; and

(D) A doctorally-prepared nurse educator or a
doctorally-prepared nurse researcher; and

(2) Four members who have a background or experience
in health care delivery, finance, workforce, representation of hospitals and
acute care hospitals of the State, and community agencies or consumer groups.

The center may invite other members of the public
with specific backgrounds to participate as ex officio, nonvoting members.

(c) The members of the advisory board for the
center for nursing shall serve without compensation.

(d) Each appointed member of the advisory
board shall serve a term of four years. No member may be appointed to more
than two consecutive terms. Any vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled
by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2;
am L 2008, c 173, §1; am L 2014, c 62, §2]

Cross References

Center for nursing fee, see §457-9.5.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next